chy.lexc
!This is meant to be basic for now. Will add the full lexicon when ready. 

Multichar_Symbols

%<px1sg%> 

%<px2sg%>

%<px3sg%>

%<px1plx%>

%<px1pli%>

%<px2pl%>

%<px3pl%>

%<pxsomeone%> !someoneʼs 



%{v%} !for possesives disappearing

%{é%} !for possesives disappearing.

%{H%} !for names hevaho and heveno

%{N%} !For twol rules not to apply in names

%{á%}

%{ó%}

%{a%}

%{ǒ%}

%{ě%}

%{e%}

%{s%}

%{o%}

%{ʼ%}

%{ē%} !stays as e

%{ō%} !stays as o



%{E%} !for vowel variation in verb obviatives. 

%{Ó%} !for vowel variation in verb obviatives







%<pl%> !plural

%<n%> ! noun

%<aa%> ! animate

%<nn%>  ! inanimate

%<v%> 	!verb

%<tr%>	!transitive

%<intr%> !intransitive

%<neg%>	!negative

%<pos%> !positive

%<par%> !participle



%<name%> !name

%<par%> !particle

!possessive nouns

@U.Poss.ne@

@U.Poss.na@

@U.Poss.he@

@U.Poss.ma@

@U.Poss.ø@

!verb person prefixes. 

@U.Pref.ná@

@U.Pref.né@

@U.Pref.é@

@U.Pref.má@

!verb negative prefix

@U.Neg.he@

@U.Neg.ø@







!ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT 

LEXICON Root



POSSPREF ;



Names ;



IA-VERBPREF ;



II-VERBPREF ;



Participle ;



VERB-TI ;



VOICE ;



NOUN-UNKNOWN ;!a noun with an unknown ending. (the majority)



OBVIATIVE-UNKNOWN ; !representing obviatives with no source. 



PREVERB ;





LEXICON K 



# ;







!NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME NAME 



LEXICON NAME

%<name%>: HEVAHO ;

%<name%>: HEVENO ;

%<name%>: K ;



LEXICON HEVAHO

%<obv1%>:%>%{H%}evaho K ;



LEXICON HEVENO

%<obv2%>:%>%{H%}eveno K ;



LEXICON POSSPREF

@U.Poss.na@:@U.Poss.na@na%> Nouns ;

@U.Poss.ne@:@U.Poss.ne@ne%> Nouns ;

@U.Poss.he@:@U.Poss.he@he%> Nouns ;

@U.Poss.ma@:@U.Poss.ma@ma%> Nouns ;

@U.Poss.ø@:@U.Poss.ø@                            Nouns ; 





LEXICON NI-PL-OT

%<n%>%<nn%>: POSS-OT ; 



LEXICON POSS-OT

@U.Poss.na@%<px1sg%>:@U.Poss.na@       PL-OT ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px2sg%>:@U.Poss.ne@       PL-OT ;

@U.Poss.he@%<px3sg%>:@U.Poss.he@       PL-OT ;

@U.Poss.ma@%<pxsomeone%>:@U.Poss.ma@       PL-OT ;

@U.Poss.na@%<px1plx%>:@U.Poss.na@%>áne  PL-OT ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px1pli%>:@U.Poss.ne@%>ane  PL-OT ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px2pl%>:@U.Poss.ne@%>évo  PL-OT ;

@U.Poss.he@%<px3pl%>:@U.Poss.he@%>évo  PL-OT ;

@U.Poss.ø@:@U.Poss.ø@                      PL-OT ;



LEXICON PL-OT



%<sg%>: K ;

%<pl%>:%>ȯtse K ;





LEXICON NI-PL-ET

%<n%>%<nn%>: POSS-ET ; 



LEXICON POSS-ET

@U.Poss.na@%<px1sg%>:@U.Poss.na@       PL-ET ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px2sg%>:@U.Poss.ne@       PL-ET ;

@U.Poss.he@%<px3sg%>:@U.Poss.he@       PL-ET ;

@U.Poss.ma@%<pxsomeone%>:@U.Poss.ma@       PL-ET ;

@U.Poss.na@%<px1plx%>:@U.Poss.na@%>áne  PL-ET ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px1pli%>:@U.Poss.ne@%>ane  PL-ET ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px2pl%>:@U.Poss.ne@%>évo  PL-ET ;

@U.Poss.he@%<px3pl%>:@U.Poss.he@%>évo  PL-ET ;

@U.Poss.ø@:@U.Poss.ø@                      PL-ET ;



LEXICON PL-ET



%<sg%>: K ;

%<pl%>:%>ėstse K ;







LEXICON NA-PL-O

%<n%>%<aa%>: POSS-O ;



LEXICON POSS-O

@U.Poss.na@%<px1sg%>:@U.Poss.na@       PL-O ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px2sg%>:@U.Poss.ne@       PL-O ;

@U.Poss.he@%<px3sg%>:@U.Poss.he@       PL-O ;

@U.Poss.ma@%<pxsomeone%>:@U.Poss.ma@       PL-O ;

@U.Poss.na@%<px1plx%>:@U.Poss.na@%>áne  PL-O ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px1pli%>:@U.Poss.ne@%>ane  PL-O ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px2pl%>:@U.Poss.ne@%>év%{ǒ%}  PL-O ;

@U.Poss.he@%<px3pl%>:@U.Poss.he@%>év%{ǒ%}  OBV-POSS ;

@U.Poss.ø@:@U.Poss.ø@                      PL-O ;



LEXICON PL-O



%<sg%>: K ;

%<pl%>:%>o%{ʼ%}%{o%} K ;

!Surprisingly also somewhat works for animate. 

LEXICON OBV-POSS !consistent in the animate third person. 

%<obv%>:%>óho K ;



LEXICON NA-PL-E

%<n%>%<aa%>: POSS-E ;



LEXICON POSS-E

@U.Poss.na@%<px1sg%>:@U.Poss.na@       PL-E ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px2sg%>:@U.Poss.ne@       PL-E ;

@U.Poss.he@%<px3sg%>:@U.Poss.he@       PL-E ;

@U.Poss.ma@%<pxsomeone%>:@U.Poss.ma@       PL-E ;

@U.Poss.na@%<px1plx%>:@U.Poss.na@%>áne  PL-E ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px1pli%>:@U.Poss.ne@%>ane  PL-E ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px2pl%>:@U.Poss.ne@%>év%{ǒ%}  PL-E ;

@U.Poss.he@%<px3pl%>:@U.Poss.he@%>év%{ǒ%}  OBV-POSS;

@U.Poss.ø@:@U.Poss.ø@                      PL-E ;



LEXICON PL-E



%<sg%>: K ;

%<pl%>:%>e%{ʼ%}%{o%} K ;



LEXICON NOUN-UNKNOWN

@U.Poss.na@:@U.Poss.na@na%> 			Nouns-uk ;

@U.Poss.ne@:@U.Poss.ne@ne%> 			Nouns-uk ;

@U.Poss.he@:@U.Poss.he@he%> 			Nouns-uk ;

@U.Poss.ma@:@U.Poss.ma@ma%> 			Nouns-uk ;

@U.Poss.ø@:@U.Poss.ø@                            Nouns-uk ;

LEXICON OBV

%<n%>%<obv%>: K ;

LEXICON NA

%<n%>%<aa%>: 				Poss-U ;

LEXICON NI

%<n%>%<nn%>: 				Poss-U ;



LEXICON Poss-U

@U.Poss.na@%<px1sg%>%<sg%>:@U.Poss.na@       		K ;

@U.Poss.ne@%<px2sg%>%<sg%>:@U.Poss.ne@       		K ;

@U.Poss.he@%<px3sg%>%<sg%>:@U.Poss.he@       		K ;

@U.Poss.ma@%<pxsomeone%>%<sg%>:@U.Poss.ma@       	K ;

@U.Poss.ø@:@U.Poss.ø@                      	K ;











!PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR PAR 

LEXICON PAR

%<Par%>: K ;

LEXICON PV %<prev%>: K ;

LEXICON IA-VERBPREF

@U.Pref.ná@:@U.Pref.ná@ná%> IA-Negative ;

@U.Pref.né@:@U.Pref.né@né%> IA-Negative ;

@U.Pref.é@:@U.Pref.é@é%> IA-Negative ;

@U.Pref.má@:@U.Pref.má@má%> IA-Negative ;



LEXICON IA-Negative

@U.Neg.he@:@U.Neg.he@%>saa IA-Verbs ;

@U.Neg.ø@:@U.Neg.ø@ IA-Verbs ; 



LEXICON VERB-IA 

%<v%>%<intr%>%<aa%>: IA-NEGSUFF ;



LEXICON IA-NEGSUFF

@U.Neg.he@%<neg%>:@U.Neg.he@%>h%{E%} IA-VERBSUFF ;

@U.Neg.ø@:@U.Neg.ø@ IA-VERBSUFF ; 



LEXICON IA-VERBSUFF

@U.Pref.ná@%<px1sg%>:@U.Pref.ná@       K ;

@U.Pref.né@%<px2sg%>:@U.Pref.né@       K ;

@U.Pref.é@%<px3sg%>:@U.Pref.é@	       K ;

@U.Pref.é@%<px3sg%>:@U.Pref.é@	       OBV-HO ;

@U.Pref.ná@%<px1plx%>:@U.Pref.ná@%>me  K ;

@U.Pref.né@%<px1pli%>:@U.Pref.né@%>ma  K ;

@U.Pref.né@%<px2pl%>:@U.Pref.né@%>me  K ;

@U.Pref.é@%<px3pl%>:@U.Pref.é@%>o%{ʼ%}%{o%}  K ;



LEXICON OBV-HO

%<obv%>:%>%{Ó%}ho K ; 



!ȯ ȧ ė á é ó š

LEXICON IA-Verbs

vóósáne:vóosané VERB-IA ;

tȧhpeta:tȧhpeta VERB-IA ;















!VERB-II VERB-II VERB-II VERB-II VERB-II VERB-II VERB-II VERB-II VERB-II VERB-II 

LEXICON II-VERBPREF

:é II-Negative ;



LEXICON II-Negative 

@U.Neg.he@:@U.Neg.he@%>saa II-Verbs ;

@U.Neg.ø@:@U.Neg.ø@ II-Verbs ; 



LEXICON VII

%<v%>%<intr%>%<nn%>: K ;

%<v%>%<intr%>%<nn%>: VII-PL-NET ;

%<v%>%<intr%>%<nn%>: RELATIONAL ;

%<v%>%<intr%>%<nn%>: NEGATIVE ;

%<v%>%<intr%>%<nn%>: RELAT-NEGATIVE ;

%<v%>%<intr%>%<nn%>: INTERROG ;

%<v%>%<intr%>%<nn%>: INT-RELAT ;

%<v%>%<intr%>%<nn%>: INT-NEG ;



LEXICON VII-PL-NET

%<pl%>:%>nėstse K ;



LEXICON RELATIONAL

%<rel%>%<sg%>:%>tse K ;

%<rel%>%<pl%>:%>net%{ō%}tse K ;



LEXICON NEGATIVE

@U.Neg.he@%<neg%>%<sg%>:@U.Neg.he@%>háne K ;

@U.Neg.he@%<neg%>%<pl%>:@U.Neg.he@%>han%{ē%}hȯtse K ;



LEXICON RELAT-NEGATIVE

@U.Neg.he@%<neg%>%<rel%>%<sg%>:@U.Neg.he@%>hanéh%{ē%}tse K ;

@U.Neg.he@%<neg%>%<rel%>%<pl%>:@U.Neg.he@%>hanéhenet%{ō%}tse K ; 

!%{ē%} %{ō%}

LEXICON INTERROG

%<int%>%<sg%>:%>%{N%}he K ;

%<int%>%<pl%>:%>nev%{ō%}tse K ;



LEXICON INT-RELAT

%<rel%>%<int%>%<sg%>:%>ts%{ē%}he K ;

%<rel%>%<int%>%<pl%>:%>n%{ē%}tsev%{ō%}tse K ;



LEXICON INT-NEG

@U.Neg.he@%<neg%>%<int%>%<sg%>:@U.Neg.he@%>han%{ē%}he K ;

@U.Neg.he@%<neg%>%<int%>%<pl%>:@U.Neg.he@%>hanev%{ō%}tse K ;





LEXICON VTI

K ;



LEXICON V

%<voice%>: K ;

LEXICON Names 
ellasar:ellasar%{N%} NAME ;
elisha:elisha%{N%} NAME ;
zerah:zerah%{N%} NAME ;
hebron:hebron%{N%} NAME ;
bethuel:bethuel%{N%} NAME ;
abel:abel%{N%} NAME ;
jeremiah:jeremiah%{N%} NAME ;
cyren:cyren%{N%} NAME ;
euphrates:euphrates%{N%} NAME ;
potiphera:potiphera%{N%} NAME ;
eden:eden%{N%} NAME ;
lea:lea%{N%} NAME ;
bera:bera%{N%} NAME ;
LEXICON Nouns !ȯ ȧ ė á é ó š
vénȯhóʼkȯhtse:vénȯhóʼkóhts NI-PL-ET ;
hova:hováhn NA-PL-E ;
hahpaneoʼo:hahpaneon%{o%} NI-PL-OT ;
hetanéšéʼše:hetanéšeʼše NA-PL-O ;
voheʼe:vȯheʼ NI-PL-ET ;
vehpȯtse:véhpot%{s%}%{e%} NI-PL-OT ;
moʼkéhnoʼhameso:moʼkéhnoʼhamėson NA-PL-O ;
heóʼȯhtáto:heóʼȯhtátón NA-PL-E ;
moʼxȯhtse:moʼxohts NI-PL-ET ;
vétanove:vétanov%{e%} NI-PL-OT ;
šeʼe:šeʼ NI-PL-ET ;
vóʼhoʼkȧsénomaʼne:vóʼhoʼkȧsénomáʼn NA-PL-E ;
vóʼėšévoʼxahto:vóʼėšévoʼxȧhtóhon NI-PL-OT ;
oneha:onéha NA-PL-O ;
ʼohta:%{v%}ʼóhtán NI-PL-ET ;
ȧhkóʼeneoʼo:ȧhkóʼeneon%{o%} NI-PL-OT ;
maʼheónoʼeétȧhéveʼhoʼe:maʼheónoʼeétȧhévéʼhóʼ NA-PL-E ;
vonȧhéʼxáʼe:vonȧhéʼxáʼ NI-PL-ET ;
véʼkėséhemėstaaʼe:véʼkėséhemėstae NA-PL-O ;
véʼhaneoʼo:véʼhaneon%{o%} NI-PL-OT ;
néškeʼesta:néškeʼėstáhn NA-PL-E ;
hesóʼxėhestaahtséménóʼe:hesóʼxėhestaahtséménóʼ NI-PL-ET ;
taaʼévėsanestȯtse:taaʼévėsanéstot%{s%}%{e%} NA-PL-O ;
tȯhooʼo:tȯhóon%{o%} NI-PL-OT ;
póʼponȯheónóʼe:póʼponȯheónóʼ NI-PL-ET ;
moéškȧhtsenánomaʼhe:moéškȧhtsenánomáʼn NA-PL-E ;
vóésta:vóestáhn NA-PL-E ;
véʼšeʼėsénȯhestȯtse:véʼšeʼėsénȯhestot%{s%}%{e%} NA-PL-O ;
hováhno:hóahnon NI-PL-ET ;
heʼevone:heʼevon NI-PL-OT ;
heóvemoʼȯhtaʼe:heóvemoʼȯhtáʼén NA-PL-E ;
táhoenótaxe:táhoenótȧxe NA-PL-O ;
táxėhahtahtȯtse:táxėhahtáhtot%{s%}%{e%} NI-PL-OT ;
moʼȯhtáevéʼhoʼe:moʼȯhtáevéʼhóʼ NA-PL-E ;
séohaseoʼo:séohaseon%{o%} NA-PL-O ;
xaoʼo:xaón%{o%} NA-PL-E ;
maʼtáaʼe:maʼtaaʼ NI-PL-ET ;
tȯhohko:tȯhóhkon NI-PL-OT ;
póéso:póeson NA-PL-O ;
hénováʼéto:hénováʼetooʼ NI-PL-ET ;
tsénėhpoʼanėstse:tsénėhpoʼanes NA-PL-E ;
héstoomȯtse:héstoomots NI-PL-ET ;
oésenaʼévaʼohtȯtse:oésenaʼévaʼȯhtot%{s%}%{e%} NA-PL-O ;
méʼšeméhne:méʼšeméhne NA-PL-O ;
vóhkėséhetane:vóhkėséhetane NA-PL-O ;
ʼahtse:%{v%}ʼȧhtsen NI-PL-OT ;
hetanéʼhame:hetanéʼhám%{e%} NA-PL-E ;
méʼkonévotseʼo:méʼkonévotseʼon%{o%} NA-PL-O ;
némeoʼȯtse:némeot%{s%}%{e%} NI-PL-OT ;
voto:voton NI-PL-ET ;
váhkótséva:váhkotseváhn NA-PL-E ;
áxȧxévo:áxȧxévon NI-PL-OT ;
LEXICON Nouns-uk
vóʼhoʼkȧsénomaʼne:vóʼhoʼkȧsénomaʼne NA ;
véʼkésȯhnéšese:véʼkésȯhnéšese NA ;
tóxeóhtséʼhe:tóxeóhtséʼhe NA ;
šéstótóʼe:šéstótóʼe NA ;
pȧhávenaʼhanéʼe:pȧhávenaʼhanéʼe NA ;
oestooʼo:oestooʼo NA ;
náhkȯheoʼémȯxoʼeha:náhkȯheoʼémȯxoʼeha NA ;
méʼševėséhe:méʼševėséhe NA ;
maʼheónoomáʼe:maʼheónoomáʼe NA ;
kaʼėškónėhame:kaʼėškónėhame NA ;
hoʼkóhomoʼe:hoʼkóhomoʼe NA ;
heʼpohtȯtse:heʼpohtȯtse NA ;
ʼestá:ʼestá NA ;
véškeeʼéhemenȯtse:véškeeʼéhemenȯtse NI ;
tšéʼkȧhonooʼo:tšéʼkȧhonooʼo NI ;
šéʼšenovotsévóʼėstse:šéʼšenovotsévóʼėstse NI ;
onóʼȯhéóʼo:onóʼȯhéóʼo NI ;
nétóváne:nétóváne NI ;
naʼevo:naʼevo NI ;
méstaehámėškone:méstaehámėškone NI ;
manestȯtse:manestȯtse NI ;
legging:legging NI ;
hóʼxėstóóʼo:hóʼxėstóóʼo NI ;
hestseʼotseʼko:hestseʼotseʼko NI ;
éškȯseeséʼxovahtȯtse:éškȯseeséʼxovahtȯtse NI ;
LEXICON OBVIATIVE-UNKNOWN
vóaxaaʼeoʼo:vóaxaaʼeoʼo OBV ;
tsémóneéšeese:tsémóneéšeese OBV ;
táxeʼėséestotȯtse:táxeʼėséestotȯtse OBV ;
šéʼšenovoto:šéʼšenovoto OBV ;
péhpeʼékȯsáne:péhpeʼékȯsáne OBV ;
onéhanótȧxeoʼo:onéhanótȧxeoʼo OBV ;
nȧhtoóʼkȯhtamȯtse:nȧhtoóʼkȯhtamȯtse OBV ;
méʼhahtsenákȯsáne:méʼhahtsenákȯsáne OBV ;
maʼėstáne:maʼėstáne OBV ;
hooʼheno:hooʼheno OBV ;
hešéonȯtse:hešéonȯtse OBV ;
eʼeʼtáhne:eʼeʼtáhne OBV ;
LEXICON Participle 
tšėheʼše:tšėheʼše PAR ;
tónėstoha:tónėstoha PAR ;
táaxaʼe:táaxaʼe PAR ;
right:right PAR ;
óʼȯsééʼėše:óʼȯsééʼėše PAR ;
nóoheʼše:nóoheʼše PAR ;
noho:noho PAR ;
nesta:nesta PAR ;
moméheome:moméheome PAR ;
hópahpa:hópahpa PAR ;
héováéstse:héováéstse PAR ;
éveto:éveto PAR ;
LEXICON PREVERB
véhpe:véhpe PV ;
totáhoʼpe:totáhoʼpe PV ;
tóe:tóe PV ;
sóʼ:sóʼ PV ;
ovóhpone:ovóhpone PV ;
oʼome:oʼome PV ;
oh:oh PV ;
nȯhtóve:nȯhtóve PV ;
momáxome:momáxome PV ;
hovave:hovave PV ;
hestome:hestome PV ;
eʼse:eʼse PV ;
LEXICON II-Verbs
tsévóʼkómo:tsévóʼkómo VII ;
tsėhesó:tsėhesó VII ;
tȯhkomó:tȯhkomó VII ;
póʼkenónoʼe:póʼkenónoʼe VII ;
onóʼehá:onóʼehá VII ;
nétȯheotse:nétȯheotse VII ;
moʼonátamánoʼe:moʼonátamánoʼe VII ;
mámȯheveotse:mámȯheveotse VII ;
hoʼotsénove:hoʼotsénove VII ;
hetȯxeʼohe:hetȯxeʼohe VII ;
hehpaoʼó:hehpaoʼó VII ;
éstovó:éstovó VII ;
LEXICON VERB-TI
vóʼhoʼkȧsén:vóʼhoʼkȧsén VTI ;
tsėhetaʼá:tsėhetaʼá VTI ;
táaʼá:táaʼá VTI ;
paʼėséestsé:paʼėséestsé VTI ;
nȯsóvoeʼá:nȯsóvoeʼá VTI ;
nėšeʼhóovaʼóʼh:nėšeʼhóovaʼóʼh VTI ;
méʼemoʼeéstsé:méʼemoʼeéstsé VTI ;
hováʼėhevátsestá:hováʼėhevátsestá VTI ;
hoʼévahtá:hoʼévahtá VTI ;
heʼkėhoʼhá:heʼkėhoʼhá VTI ;
eʼȯsén:eʼȯsén VTI ;
amestá:amestá VTI ;
LEXICON VOICE
talk:talk V ;
see:see V ;
ó:ó V ;
have:have V ;
final:final V ;
esp:esp V ;
énanéahtovóho:énanéahtovóho V ;
éheʼéveʼhahe:éheʼéveʼhahe V ;
e:e V ;
category:category V ;
aé:aé V ;
a:a V ;
